lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Spynos ir raktai: Raktų ruošiniai; Raktų dangteliai; Raktų-kortelių įvesties sistemos; Spynos ir skląsčiai
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Замки и ключи: Заготовки для ключей; Накладки на ключи; Системы доступа с картой-ключом; Замки и защелки
sv: Metallprodukter > Lås och låssmideri: Nyckelämnen; Nyckelmarkörer; Passerkortssystem; Lås och hakar
fr: Quincaillerie > Serrures et clés: Clés brutes; Coques de clé; Systèmes d’accès par carte; Verrous et loquets
nb: Maskinvare > Låser og nøkler: Nøkkelemner; Nøkkelhetter; Inngangssystemer med nøkkelkort; Låser og hengsler
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Ključavnice in ključi: Neobdelani ključi; Pokrovčki za ključe; Sistemi za vstop s kartico; Ključavnice in zapahi
ro-RO: Feronerie > Încuietori și chei: Chei oarbe; Capace pentru chei; Sisteme de intrare cu card; Încuietori și zăvoare
vi: Phần cứng > Khóa & Chìa khóa: Chìa khóa trống; Nắp chụp chìa khóa; Hệ thống ra vào dùng thẻ; Khóa và chốt
hu: Hardver > Zárak és kulcsok: Kulcsalapok; Kulcssapkák; Kulcskártya-beviteli rendszerek; Zárak és reteszek
fi: Rakentaminen > Lukot ja avaimet: Avainaihiot; Avaimen lehdet; Avainkorttijärjestelmät; Lukot ja salvat
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > แม่กุญแจและลูกกุญแจ: กุญแจที่ยังไม่ได้ปั๊ม; ฝาครอบกุญแจ; ระบบผ่านประตูแบบคีย์การ์ด; ล็อคและกลอน
pt-PT: Equipamento > Cadeados e chaves: Chaves em bruto; Tampas de chaves; Sistemas de entrada cartão chave; Fechos e trincos
bg-BG: Железария > Брави и ключове: Заготовки за ключове; Капачки за ключове; Картови системи за заключване; Брави и ключалки
ja: DIY用品 > 鍵: ブランクキー; キーキャップ; カードキーシステム; 錠・掛金
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Schlösser & Schlüssel: Schlüsselrohlinge; Schlüsselkappen; Kartenschließsysteme; Schlösser & Riegel
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Κλειδαριές & κλειδιά: Κενά κλειδιά; Καλύμματα κλειδιών; Συστήματα εισόδου με κάρτα κλειδί; Κλειδαριές & μάνδαλα
ko: 철물 > 자물쇠/열쇠: 미가공 열쇠; 열쇠 커버; 키 카드 입력 시스템; 자물쇠/걸쇠
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 锁与钥匙: 钥匙坯; 钥匙帽; 门卡门禁系统; 锁和插销
sk-SK: Náradie > Zámky a kľúče: Štandardné kľúče; Kľúčenky; Vstupné systémy s kľúčovými kartami; Zámky a západky
pt-BR: Ferragens > Cadeados e chaves: Chaves em bruto; Capas para chaves; Sistemas de fechadura com cartão; Fechaduras e trincos
tr: Hırdavat > Kilitler ve Anahtarlar: Ham Anahtarlar; Anahtar Başlıkları; Kartlı Giriş Sistemleri; Kilitler ve Mandallar
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Serrature e chiavi: Chiavi per duplicati; Cappucci per chiavi; Sistemi ingresso con chiave magnetica; Lucchetti e chiavistelli
da: Isenkram > Låse og nøgler: Utilfilede nøgler; Nøglehætter; Kortadgangssystemer; Låse og klinker
pl: Sprzęt > Zamki i klucze: Surówki kluczy; Nasadki na klucze; Systemy kart wejściowych; Blokady i zatrzaski
es: Bricolaje > Llaves y cerrojos: Llaves vírgenes; Cubrellaves; Sistemas de admisión de tarjeta de acceso; Candados y pestillos
hr-HR: Željezarija > Brave i ključevi: Neobrađeni ključevi; Kapice za ključeve; UIazni sustavi s ključ karticama; Brave i zasuni
en: Hardware > Locks & Keys: Key Blanks; Key Caps; Key Card Entry Systems; Locks & Latches
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Sloten en sleutels: Sleutelblanken; Sleutelhoesjes; Toegangssystemen met sleutelkaart; Sloten en grendels
zh-TW: 硬體 > 鎖和鑰匙: 原型鑰匙; 鑰匙套; 磁卡鑰匙門禁系統; 鎖閂
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Zámky a klíče: Profily klíčů; Rozlišovače na klíče; Vstupní systémy na kartu; Zámky a závory